en: Plain fresh cream cheese around 3% fat
fr: Fromage blanc nature à 3% de matières grasses environ

en: Plain creamy fresh cream cheese around 8% fat
fr: Fromage blanc nature gourmand à 8% de matières grasses environ

en: Plain fresh cream cheese reduced fat
fr: Fromage blanc nature allégé en matières grasses

en: Fromages blancs with fruits, Fresh cream cheese with fruits and sugar around 7% fat
fr: Fromages blancs aux fruits, Fromage blanc gourmand sucré aux fruits à 7% de matières grasses environ, Spécialité laitière sucrée aux fruits à 7% de matières grasses environ

en: Fresh cream cheese with cow's milk
fr: Fromages blancs au lait de vache

fr: Fromages blancs au lait de brebis
en: Fresh cream cheese with sheeps's milk

fr: Fromages blancs au lait de chèvre
en: Fresh cream cheese with goat's milk

en: Fat free plain fermented dairy desserts, Fat free plain fermented milk yogurt, Fat free plain dairy specialty
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés nature sans matière grasse, Yaourt nature au lait fermenté à 0% de matières grasses, Spécialité laitière à 0% de matières grasses

en: Plain fermented dairy desserts with cream, Plain fermented milk yogurt with cream, Plain dairy specialty with cream, Plain yogurts with cream, plain fermented milks with cream, plain dairy specialties with cream
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés nature à la crème, Yaourt au lait fermenté à la crème, Spécialité laitière nature à la crème, Yaourts à la crème, Laits fermentés à la crème, Spécialités laitières nature à la crème, laits-fermentes

en: Fat free fermented dairy desserts with sweeteners, Fat free flavoured fermented milk yogurt with sweetener, Fat free flavoured dairy specialty with sweetener
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés édulcorés sans matière grasse, Yaourt avec édulcorants à 0% de matières grasses, Lait fermenté avec édulcorants à 0% de matières grasses, Spécialité laitière aromatisée avec édulcorants à 0% de matières grasses

en: Flavoured fermented dairy desserts with sugar and cream, Fermented milk flavoured yogurt with sugar and cream, Flavoured dairy specialty with sugar and cream
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés aromatisés sucrés à la crème, Yaourt sucré aromatisé au lait fermenté et à la crème, Spécialité laitière aromatisée sucrée à la crème
hr: Aromatizirani fermentirani mliječni deserti sa šećerom i vrhnjem
it: Yogurt aromatizzato al latte fermentato con zucchero e panna

en: Fat free fermented dairy desserts with fruits and sweeteners fortified with vitamin D, Fat free fermented milk yogurt with fruits and sweetener fortified with vitamin D, Fat free dairy specialty with fruits and sweetener fortified with vitamin D
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés aux fruits édulcorés sans matière grasse enrichis en vitamine D, Yaourt aux fruits avec édulcorants à 0% de matières grasses enrichi en vitamine D, Lait fermenté aux fruits avec édulcorants à 0% de matières grasses enrichi en vitamine D, Spécialité laitière aux fruits avec édulcorants à 0% de matières grasses enrichie en vitamine D

en: Fermented dairy desserts with fruits sugar and cream, Fermented milk yogurt with fruits and sugar and cream, Dairy specialty with fruits and sugar and cream
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés aux fruits sucrés à la crème, Yaourt sucré au lait fermenté aux fruits et à la crème, Spécialité laitière sucrée aux fruits et à la crème

en: Fermented dairy desserts with fruits enriched with vitamin D, Fermented milk yogurt fortified with vitamin D with fruits and sugar, Dairy specialty fortified with vitamin D with fruits and sugar
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés aux fruits enrichis en vitamine D, Yaourt sucré au lait fermenté aux fruits enrichi en vitamine D, Spécialité laitière sucrée aux fruits enrichie en vitamine D

en: Fermented dairy desserts with fruits and sweeteners, Yogurt with fruits and sweetener, Yogurt fruit flavoured with sweetener, Fermented milk with fruits and sweetener, Fermented milk fruit flavoured with sweetener, Dairy specialty with fruits and sweetener, Dairy specialty fruit flavoured with sweetener
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés édulcorés aux fruits, Yaourt aromatisé avec édulcorants, Yaourt aux fruits avec édulcorants, Lait fermenté aromatisé avec édulcorants, Lait fermenté aux fruits avec édulcorants, Spécialité laitière aromatisée avec édulcorants, Spécialité laitière aux fruits avec édulcorants
hr: Fermentirani mliječni deserti s voćem i zaslađivačima
pt: Iogurtes com frutas e adoçante

en: Fat free fermented dairy desserts with fruits and sweeteners, Fat free fermented milk yogurt with fruits and sweetener, Fat free dairy specialty with fruits and sweetener
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés édulcorés aux fruits sans matière grasse, Yaourt aux fruits avec édulcorants à 0% de matières grasses, Lait fermenté aux fruits avec édulcorants à 0% de matières grasses, Spécialité laitière aux fruits avec édulcorants à 0% de matières grasses

en: sheep's-milk cheeses, Sheep cheeses, Cheeses from sheep milk
bg: Овче сирене и кашкавал
ca: formatge de llet d'ovella
cs: ovčí sýr
de: Schafmilchkäse, Schafskäse, Schafkäse, Käse aus Schafsmilch
el: πρόβειο τυρί
es: Quesos de leche de oveja, queso de leche de oveja, Quesos de oveja
fa: پنیر شیر گوسفند
fi: lampaanmaitojuustot
fr: Fromages de brebis, fromage de brebis, fromage au lait de brebis, Fromages au lait de brebis
he: גבינת כבשים
hr: Sirevi od ovčjeg mlijeka
hy: ոչխարի պանիր
it: formaggio di pecore, Formaggio di pecora
ja: 羊乳チーズ
ko: 양젖 치즈
lt: Avių sūriai
nl: Schapenkazen, Schapenkaas
nn: ost av sauemjølk
pl: ser z mleka owczego
pt: Queijos de ovelha
ro: Brânză din lapte de oaie
ru: сыр из овечьего молока
sr: овчији сир
sv: Fårost
zh: 羊奶酪

en: Old sheep cheese
es: Queso oveja viejo

fr: Fondues, fondue, fondues de fromage, fondue de fromage
ja: フォンデュ
nl: Fondus, Kaasfondus

en: Cheese from ewe's whey
fr: Fromage de lactosérum de brebis